Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Public Assistance Program
205.231.
Appeals — Hearing officers — Appeal board — Procedure.

The secretary shall appoint one (1) or more impartial hearing officers to hear and decide upon appealed decisions.

Any applicant or recipient who is dissatisfied with the decision or delay in action on his application for public assistance or the amount granted to him may appeal to a hearing officer, except that an appeal and a hearing need not be granted if the sole issue is a federal or state law requiring an automatic change adversely affecting some or all recipients of the Kentucky medical assistance program so long as advance notice of the change, with an explanation of appeal rights, is provided to all affected recipients. However, a recipient may appeal whether the cabinet is accurately interpreting a change in federal or state law which may adversely affect the recipient. On receipt of an appeal, an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The secretary may appoint an Appeal Board for Public Assistance composed of the secretary and two (2) other members. The secretary shall be chairman, and he and one (1) other member constitute a quorum.

Any applicant or recipient who is dissatisfied with the decision of a hearing officer may appeal to the appeal board in the manner and form prescribed by administrative regulation. The board may on its own motion affirm, modify, or set aside any decision of a hearing officer on the basis of the evidence previously submitted in the case, or direct the taking of additional evidence, or may permit any of the parties to the decision to initiate further appeals before it. The board may remove itself or transfer to another hearing officer the proceedings on any appeal pending before a hearing officer. The board shall promptly notify the parties to any proceedings of its findings and decisions.

The manner in which appeals are presented and hearings and appeals conducted under subsection (4) of this section shall be in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary.

After a decision by the appeal board, any party aggrieved by the decision may seek judicial review of the decision by filing a petition in the Circuit Court of the county in which the petitioner resides, in accordance with KRS 13B.140, 13B.150, and 13B.160.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 89, § 1; 1972, ch. 256, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21); 1980, ch. 188, § 194, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 436, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 96, effective July 15, 1996.

205.234.
Judicial review of appeal board decision on public assistance — Judgment. [Repealed.]

205.237.
Public assistance claimant may have counsel — Fees.

Any individual claiming public assistance in any proceeding before the appeal board or a court may be represented by counsel; but no counsel shall either charge or receive for such service more than an amount established by the secretary by administrative regulation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 89, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21).

205.240.
Public assistance funds — Availability to secretary.

All money appropriated by this state, all money received from the United States or any agency thereof, and all money received from any other source for the public assistance functions administered by the cabinet are hereby appropriated and shall be available to the secretary for expenditure consistent with the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 195.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 110, § 10; 1952, ch. 33, § 6; 1956, ch. 75, § 4; 1972, ch. 256, § 11; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21), (29).

205.245.
Supplementary payments.

Money payments made by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to the needy aged, needy blind, and the needy permanently and totally disabled shall be:

Mandatory state supplementation of the supplemental security income program as established by federal law and regulations and administered in the manner agreed to by the secretary of the United States Department of Health, Education, and Welfare and the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or their authorized representatives; and

Supplemental payments to persons requiring special living arrangements as they become eligible for the supplemental security income program, to insure the same level of care as those persons covered under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 343, § 22; 1998, ch. 426, § 191, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 224, effective June 20, 2005.

205.250.
Continuation of assistance to present recipients. [Repealed.]

205.260.
Claims against estates of deceased recipients of payment. [Repealed.]

205.270.
Real property lien — Filing — Enforcement. [Repealed.]

205.280.
Precipitation of claim and enforcement of lien during life of recipient. [Repealed.]

205.290.
Revolving fund — Disbursement — Balance not to lapse.

The amounts recovered for any reason from a recipient or the estate of a recipient of public assistance shall be deposited to a special account in the revolving, trust and agency fund account of the cabinet. This fund shall be administered and disbursed in the same manner and under the same conditions and requirements as is provided by law for other special funds in the State Treasury. The moneys received heretofore and hereafter deposited in the fund may in the discretion of the secretary and with the approval of the Governor be used for public assistance administrative cost, grant purposes, or both. Any balance in this fund shall not lapse at any time, but shall be continuously available to the cabinet for the purposes set out in this section. A general statement that all continuing appropriations are repealed shall not be construed as repealing this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 33, § 10; 1956, ch. 29, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21).

205.300.
Standards for public medical and private institutions. [Repealed.]

205.310.
Liability of stepparent for support furnished child.

In addition to any other liability imposed by law, the stepparent of any child who is an applicant or recipient of public assistance shall be legally chargeable with the support of such child in the same manner as a biological parent.

History.
Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 33, § 12.

205.320.
Applications of KRS 205.160 to 205.250 to provisions of KRS 205.260 to 205.320. [Repealed.]

205.325.
Claims and liens against the estate of recipients of public assistance void, when. [Repealed.]

205.330.
Social service advisory committees — Membership — Appointment — Organization. [Repealed.]

205.335.
Functions of committees — Privacy of meetings — Regulations — Reimbursement for expenses. [Repealed.]

205.340.
Interim service by social service committee. [Repealed.]

205.350.
Office for coordination of community resources for employment and training. [Repealed.]